Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6064.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 31 of the General Laws entitled "MOTOR AND OTHER VEHICLES"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 10.5
STATE IDENTIFICATION CARDS FOR MINORS WITHOUT RESIDENCE ACT
31-10.5-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "State Identification Cards For Minors
Without Residence Act".
31-10.5-2. Minors without permanent residence.
(a) Minors between fourteen (14) and seventeen (17) years of age, that are Rhode Island
residents without a permanent residence shall be eligible to receive a state identification card issued
by the department of motor vehicles (DMV) pursuant to § 3-8-6.1.
(b) For issuance of state identification cards, the DMV shall accept the following as proof
of identification:
(1) Minors in the care of the department of children, youth, and families (DCYF) shall be
eligible for a state identification card with a signed letter from the administrator of DCYF.
(2) Minors in the care of a shelter shall be eligible for a state identification card with a
signed letter from the administrator of the shelter.
(3) Minors residing in a shelter with a parental guardian for at least thirty (30) days shall

be eligible with a letter from the shelter administrator attesting to their occupancy in the shelter,
the minor's birth certificate, social security card, passport or driver’s license. In the event a minor
is residing in a shelter without a parental guardian due to unforeseen circumstances, the shelter
administrator may represent the child as the legal guardian for the purposes of this section.
(c) Minors seeking state identification cards in accordance with this chapter shall be exempt
from the licensing fees contained in § 3-8-6.1.
SECTION 2. Sections 23-3-24 and 23-3-25 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-3 entitled
"Vital Records" are hereby amended to read as follows:
23-3-24. Copies of data from vital records.
In accordance with § 23-3-23 and the regulations adopted pursuant to that section:
(1) The state registrar of vital records shall upon request issue a certified copy of any
certificate or record in the registrar’s custody or a part thereof. Each copy issued shall show the
date of registration; and copies issued from records marked “delayed,” “amended,” or “court order”
shall be similarly marked and show the effective date. Any copies issued of a “certificate of foreign
birth” shall indicate this fact and show the actual place of birth.
(2) The local registrars shall upon request issue a certified copy of any certificate or record
in the local registrar’s custody or to which the local registrar has access only in a form that shall be
prescribed by the state director of health or the state archives under the control of the secretary of
state, following transfer pursuant to § 23-3-5.1.
(3) A certified copy of a certificate or any part thereof, issued in accordance with
subdivision (1) or (2) of this section, shall be considered for all purposes the same as the original,
and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the certificate, provided that the evidentiary
value of a certificate or record filed more than one year after the event, or a record that has been
amended, or a “certificate of foreign birth,” shall be determined by the judicial or administrative
body or official before whom the certificate is offered as evidence.
(4) The National Office of Vital Statistics may be furnished copies or data that it may
require for national statistics; provided, that the state shall be reimbursed for the cost of furnishing
the data; and provided further, that the data shall not be used for other than statistical purposes by
the National Office of Vital Records unless so authorized by the state registrar of vital records.
(5) Federal, state, local, and other public or private agencies may, upon request, be
furnished copies or data for statistical purposes upon terms or conditions that may be prescribed by
the state director of health.
(6) No person shall prepare or issue any certificate which purports to be an original certified
copy, or copy of a certificate of birth, death, or fetal death, except as authorized in this chapter or
LC002399 - Page 2 of 5

regulations adopted under this chapter.
(7) A child who is at least sixteen (16) years of age and who either does not have a residence
address or is in the department of children, youth and family's custody may receive a certified copy
of the child's certificate of birth registration without the signature of the child’s parent, guardian,
or foster parent.
23-3-25. Fees for copies and searches
(a) The state registrar shall charge fees for searches and copies as follows:
(1) For a search of two (2) consecutive calendar years under one name and for issuance of
a certified copy of a certificate of birth, fetal death, death, or marriage, or a certification of birth, or
a certification that the record cannot be found, and each duplicate copy of a certificate or
certification issued at the same time, the fee is as set forth in § 23-1-54.
(2) For each additional calendar year search, if applied for at the same time or within three
(3) months of the original request and if proof of payment for the basic search is submitted, the fee
is as set forth in § 23-1-54.
(3) For providing expedited service, the additional handling fee is as set forth in § 23-1-54.
(4) For processing of adoptions, legitimations, or paternity determinations as specified in
§§ 23-3-14 and 23-3-15, there shall be a fee as set forth in § 23-1-54.
(5) For making authorized corrections, alterations, and additions, the fee is as set forth in
§ 23-1-54; provided, no fee shall be collected for making authorized corrections or alterations and
additions on records filed before one year of the date on which the event recorded has occurred.
(6) For examination of documentary proof and the filing of a delayed record, there is a fee
as set forth in § 23-1-54; and there is an additional fee as set forth in § 23-1-54 for the issuance of
a certified copy of a delayed record.
(b) Fees collected under this section by the state registrar shall be deposited in the general
fund of this state, according to the procedures established by the state treasurer.
(c) The local registrar shall charge fees for searches and copies of records as follows:
(1) For a search of two (2) consecutive calendar years under one name and for issuance of
a certified copy of a certificate of birth, fetal death, death, delayed birth, or marriage, or a
certification of birth or a certification that the record cannot be found, the fee is twenty dollars
($20.00). For each duplicate copy of a certificate or certification issued at the same time, the fee is
fifteen dollars ($15.00).
(2) For each additional calendar year search, if applied for at the same time or within three
(3) months of the original request and if proof of payment for the basic search is submitted, the fee
is two dollars ($2.00).
LC002399 - Page 3 of 5

(d) Fees collected under this section by the local registrar shall be deposited in the city or
town treasury according to the procedures established by the city or town treasurer except that six
dollars ($6.00) of the certified copy fees shall be submitted to the state registrar for deposit in the
general fund of this state.
(e) To acquire, maintain, and operate an electronic statewide registration system (ESRS),
the state registrar shall assess a surcharge of no more than five dollars ($5.00) for a mail-in certified
records request, no more than three dollars ($3.00) for each duplicate certified record, and no more
than two dollars ($2.00) for a walk-in certified records request or a certified copy of a vital record
requested for a local registrar. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (d), any such
surcharges collected by the local registrar shall be submitted to the state registrar. Any funds
collected from the surcharges listed above shall be deposited as general revenues.
(f) An individual in accordance with § 23-3-24(7) shall not be charged a fee by the state
registrar.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002399
========
LC002399 - Page 4 of 5